Mississippi, session 2026, SB3379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Jackson County for the purpose of defraying costs associated with certain infrastructure projects to promote and secure development in the Gulf Park Estates area for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............ $ 4,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, the following amounts are to be allocated as follows: To defray costs of repair, replacement, rehabilitation and/or expansion of existing and proposed gravity sewer system, wastewater lift stations and force mains and associated infrastructure......................... $ 2,500,000.00. To defray costs of repair, replacement, rehabilitation and/or expansion of existing and proposed water distribution system.................... $ 1,500,000.00. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.